Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-302] Notice filing. (a) With
respect to a federal covered security, as defined in section 18(b)(2) of the
Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(2)), that is not otherwise exempt
under sections 485A-201 to 485A-203, the following records shall be filed with
the commissioner:

(1) Initial offers.

(A) Before the initial offer of a federal
covered security in this State, all records that are part of a federal
registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under
the Securities Act of 1933 and a consent to service of process complying with
section 485A-610 signed by the issuer; or

(B) After the initial offer of the federal
covered security in this State, all records that are part of an amendment to a
federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission under the Securities Act of 1933; and

(2) Report. To the extent necessary or appropriate
to compute fees, the commissioner may by rule or order require a report
of the value of the federal covered securities sold or offered to persons
present in this State, if the sales data are not included in records filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission, and payment of a fee of $50.

(b) The fee for an initial notice filing for
investment company securities shall be $200 per portfolio or series.

(c) A notice filing under subsection (a) is
effective for one year commencing on the later of the notice filing or the
effectiveness of the offering filed with the Securities and Exchange
Commission. On or before expiration, the issuer may renew a notice filing by
filing a copy of those records filed by the issuer with the Securities and
Exchange Commission that are required by rule or order under this chapter to be
filed and by paying a renewal fee of $50. A previously filed consent to
service of process complying with section 485A-610 may be incorporated by
reference in a renewal. A renewed notice filing becomes effective upon the
expiration of the filing being renewed.

(d) With respect to a security that is a
federal covered security under section 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of
1933 (15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(4)(D)), a rule adopted under this chapter may require a
notice filing by or on behalf of an issuer to include a copy of Form D,
including the Appendix, as promulgated by the Securities and Exchange
Commission, and a consent to service of process complying with section 485A-610
signed by the issuer not later than fifteen days after the first sale of the
federal covered security in this State, and the payment of a fee of $200.

(e) Except with respect to a federal security
under section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(1)), if
the commissioner finds that there is a failure to comply with a notice or fee
requirement of this section, the commissioner may issue a stop order suspending
the offer and sale of a federal covered security in this State. If the
deficiency is corrected, the stop order is void as of the time of its issuance
and no penalty may be imposed by the commissioner. [L 2006, c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next